Utah statutes.
70C-5-105.   Duty of buyer -- No compensation for services prior to
cancellation.
(1)  Except as provided by the provisions on retention of goods by the buyer
under Subsection 70C-5-104(4), within a reasonable time after a home
solicitation sale has been canceled or an offer to purchase revoked, the buyer
upon demand shall tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller
pursuant to the sale, but he is not obligated to tender at any place other
than his residence or place of employment.  If the seller fails to demand
possession of goods within a reasonable period of time after cancellation or
revocation, the goods become the property of the buyer without obligation to
pay for them.  For the purpose of this section, 40 days is a reasonable period
of time.
(2)  The buyer has a duty to take reasonable care of the goods in his
possession before cancellation or revocation and for a reasonable time
thereafter, during which time the goods are otherwise at the seller's risk.
(3)  If the seller has performed any services pursuant to a home solicitation
sale prior to its cancellation, the seller is entitled to no compensation.
